Wyoming, session 2026, SF0117.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 15-1-603(a) is amended to read:

15-1-603. Regulations; protest makes change
ineffective; exception; hearing and notice.

(a) If there is a protest against a change in the
regulations, restrictions or district boundaries signed by
more than one (1) of the owners of twenty percent (20%) who
demonstrate a concrete and particularized harm and who
SF0117

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0477
either own thirty‑three percent (33%) or more of the area of
the lots included in the proposed change, or of those
comprise thirty‑three percent (33%) or more of the owners
immediately adjacent within a distance of one hundred forty
(140) three hundred (300) feet, the change is not effective
except upon the affirmative vote of three-fourths (3/4)
two‑thirds (2/3) of all the members of the governing body.
In determining the one hundred forty (140) three hundred
(300) feet, the width of any intervening street or alley
shall not be included.

Section 2. This act shall apply to zoning changes
made on and after July 1, 2026.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0117